Arkansas, session 2025, SB629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-22-211(d) concerning the prohibition
against the practice of law for corporations or associations, is amended to
read as follows:
(d) This section does not apply to a:
(1) For-profit corporation or voluntary association lawfully
engaged in:
(A) The examination and insuring of titles to real
property; or
(B) Employing an attorney or attorneys in and about its
own immediate affairs or in any litigation to which it is or may become a
party;
(2) Nonprofit corporation or voluntary association lawfully
engaged in representing or assisting an indigent, poor, or disadvantaged
*CEB246*
04/04/2025 10:20:14 AM CEB246

SB629
person as a client in a civil or criminal matter, if any legal services
rendered by the nonprofit corporation or voluntary association are furnished
through licensed attorneys in accordance with rules governing the practice of
law in Arkansas; or
(3) Nonprofit corporation, voluntary association, or
instrumentality of the government recognized under 26 U.S.C. § 115 that is
engaged in representing or assisting as a client in a civil matter one (1) of
the following entities, if any legal services rendered are furnished through
licensed attorneys in accordance with rules governing the practice of law in
Arkansas:
(A) A city, county, or public school district;
(B) The officers and employees of a city, county, or
public school district;
(C) A self-funding group of a city, county, or public
school district as required under § 14-60-101 et seq., § 14-26-101 et seq.,
or § 6-17-1401 et seq.; or
(D) A self-insurance risk pool of a city, county, or
public school district; or
(4) Closely held corporation engaged in representing the closely
held corporation if the:
(A) Closely held corporation has fewer than twenty (20)
shareholders;
(B) Proceedings are related to an eviction under § 18-17-
901 et seq. or an unlawful detainer under § 18-60-301 et seq; and
(C) Closely held corporation is represented in the
proceedings by an officer of the closely held corporation.










04/04/2025 10:20:14 AM CEB246